
−DIAGNOSTICS MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM
DI−11 25

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC B1214 Door system communication bus malfunc-
tion (+B short)

DTC B1215 Door system communication bus malfunc-
tion (GND short)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This DTC is output when +B or GND short occurs on the door system communication bus.

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−111 8.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check communication circuit inside ECU.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the following ECU connectors in order from the top downward.
HINT:
Before disconnecting the next connector, be sure that disconnected ECU connector is reconnected.

Disconnect ECU connector Connector No.

Power window master switch (Driver door ECU) P15

Power window switch (Front RH door ECU) LHD
Power window switch (Front LH door ECU) RHD

P12 (LHD)
P11 (RHD)

Power window switch (Rear LH door ECU) P13

Power window switch (Rear RH door ECU) P14

CHECK:
Check the DTC every time each connector is disconnect.
OK:
DTC B1214 or  B1215 is not output.

OK Replace corresponding ECU (ECU for which
DTC is deleted is defective.)
(See page IN−38).

NG
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Body control ECU
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2 Check for short circuit.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the following connectors of ECU.
HINT:
Before disconnecting the next connector, be sure reconnect the ECU connector that is already discon-
nected.

Disconnect ECU connector Connector No.

Body ECU
Power window master switch (Driver door ECU)

B12
P15

Body ECU
Power window switch (Front RH door ECU ) LHD
Power window switch (Front RH door ECU ) RHD

B12
P12 (LHD) / P11 (RHD)

Body ECU
Power window switch (Rear LH door ECU )

B13
P13

Body ECU
Power window switch (Rear RH door ECU )

B13
P14

CHECK:
Check whether or not there is +B short and GND short between the above connectors.
OK:

No +B short and GND short.

NG Repair or replace corresponding wire harness.

OK

Replace Body control ECU
(See page IN−38).


